Utah statutes.
10-18-101.   Title -- Policy statement.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Municipal Cable Television and Public Telecommunications Services Act."

(2)  The Legislature finds that it is the policy of this state to:

(a)  ensure that cable television services and public telecommunications services are provided through fair competition consistent with the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104-104, in order to provide the widest possible diversity of information and news sources to the general public;

(b)  advance the exercise of rights under the First Amendment of the Constitution of the United States;

(c)  enhance the development and widespread use of technological advances in providing cable television services and public telecommunications services;

(d)  encourage improved customer service of cable television services and public telecommunications services at competitive rates;

(e)  ensure that cable television services and public telecommunications services are each provided within a consistent, comprehensive, and nondiscriminatory federal, state, and local government framework; and

(f)  ensure that when a municipality provides to its inhabitants cable television services, public telecommunications services, or both, and competes with private providers whose activities are regulated by the municipality, the municipality does not discriminate against the competing providers of the same services.

